Washington statutes.
RCW 43.370.050

Requests for data and other information.

(1) The office may respond to requests for data and other information from its computerized system for special studies and analysis consistent with requirements for confidentiality of patient, provider, and facility-specific records. The office may require requestors to pay any or all of the reasonable costs associated with such requests that might be approved.

(2) Data elements related to the identification of individual patient's, provider's, and facility's care outcomes are confidential, are exempt from RCW 42.56.030 through 42.56.570 and * 42.17.350 through 42.17.450, and are not subject to discovery by subpoena or admissible as evidence.

[ 2007 c 259 s 54.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 42.17 RCW relating to "campaign finance" was recodified pursuant to 2010 c 204 s 1102, effective January 1, 2012. See Comparative Table for chapter 42.17 RCW in the Table of Disposition of Former RCW Sections.